Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1645
Employee; death; election to continue coverage; procedure.

If the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children elect to continue such coverage, the election form and the first monthly premium shall be sent by certified mail with return receipt requested to the insurance company or health maintenance organization within thirty-one days after the date of the death of the employee. Premiums for each subsequent month shall be paid by the covered surviving spouse or covered surviving dependent children without further notice.

Laws 1989, LB 318, § 6.